Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$6,315,525, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human  Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is decreased by $29,940, for a budget
realignment.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased
by $11,525,734, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation services, is increased by  $3,578,531, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5547 (SB 5547-A) Page 1
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation services, is in-
creased by $3,723,407, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for child welfare programs, is decreased by $25,904,346,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child  welfare programs, is decreased by
$6,559,807, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is in-
creased by $255,050, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human  Services, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is increased by
$18,267,892, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (11), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities - ARPA  State Fiscal Recovery
Fund moneys for long term care workforce development and emergency preparedness, is
decreased by $7,183,767, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department  of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $64,406,239, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,
is increased by $6,791,006, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
Enrolled Senate Bill 5547 (SB 5547-A) Page 2
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $17,645,569, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 14.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (9), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership, is increased by  $2,760,408, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for central services, is increased  by $500,000, for case
management and other assistance to flood survivors in Coos, Douglas and Harney counties.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30,  2025, for Health Systems Division - Administration, is in-
creased by $8,897,197, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health  Systems Division - Programs, is decreased by
$103,222,213, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 12, chapter 71, Oregon Laws  2024, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to provide the nonfederal matching share required for  costs
of targeted case management services in  the Nurse-Family Partnership nurse home visiting
services program, is decreased by $1,455,147, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (3), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for health  policy and analytics, is increased by $12,068,749,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 305, chapter 605,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending  June 30, 2025, to provide reimbursements under section 3, chapter 441,
Oregon Laws 2023, is decreased by $3,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (4), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for public  health, is increased by $13,983,397, for a budget
realignment.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (5), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Oregon State  Hospital, is increased by $20,274,996, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems  Division - Admin-
istration, is increased by $5,845,103, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5547 (SB 5547-A) Page 3
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems Division  - Pro-
grams, is decreased by $19,732,258, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (5), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for public health, is decreased by
$807,608, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority,  for Oregon State Hospital, is increased
by $48,136,743, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for Health Systems Division - Administration, is
increased by $11,876,621, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 28.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, Health Systems Division - Programs, is increased
by $305,985,650, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 29.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (5), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Oregon State Hospital, is  increased by
$3,421,054, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 30.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5547 (SB 5547-A) Page 4
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5547 (SB 5547-A) Page 5